Illinois, session 104th, SB3923.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Illinois Lottery Law is amended by changing 5Section 21.6 as follows: 6    (20 ILCS 1605/21.6)7    Sec. 21.6. Scratch-off for Illinois veterans.8    (a) The Department shall offer a special instant 9scratch-off game for the benefit of Illinois veterans. The 10game shall commence on January 1, 2006 or as soon thereafter, 11at the discretion of the Director, as is reasonably practical. 12The operation of the game shall be governed by this Act and any 13rules adopted by the Department.14    (b) The Illinois Veterans Assistance Fund is created as a 15special fund in the State treasury. The net revenue from the 16Illinois veterans scratch-off game shall be deposited into the 17Fund for appropriation by the General Assembly solely to the 18Department of Veterans Affairs for making grants, funding 19additional services, or conducting additional research 20projects relating to each of the following:21        (i) veterans' behavioral health services;22        (ii) veterans' homelessness;23        (iii) the health insurance costs of veterans;  SB3923- 2 -LRB104 20080 CCC 33531 b1        (iv) veterans' disability benefits, including but not 2    limited to, disability benefits provided by veterans 3    service organizations and veterans assistance commissions 4    or centers;5        (v) the long-term care of veterans; provided that, 6    beginning with moneys appropriated for fiscal year 2008, 7    no more than 20% of such moneys shall be used for health 8    insurance costs;9        (vi) veteran employment and employment training; and10        (vii) veterans' emergency financial assistance, 11    including, but not limited to, past due utilities, 12    housing, and transportation costs. 13    In order to expend moneys from this special fund, 14beginning with moneys appropriated for fiscal year 2008, the 15Director of Veterans Affairs shall appoint a 3-member funding 16authorization committee. The Director shall designate one of 17the members as chairperson. The committee shall meet twice a 18year on a quarterly basis, at a minimum, and shall authorize 19expenditure of moneys from the special fund by a two-thirds 20vote. Decisions of the committee shall not take effect unless 21and until approved by the Director of Veterans Affairs. Each 22member of the committee shall serve until a replacement is 23named by the Director of Veterans Affairs. One member of the 24committee shall be a member of the Veterans' Advisory Council.25    Moneys collected from the special instant scratch-off game 26shall be used only as a supplemental financial resource and   SB3923- 3 -LRB104 20080 CCC 33531 b1shall not supplant existing moneys that the Department of 2Veterans Affairs may currently expend for the purposes set 3forth in items (i) through (v). 4    Moneys received for the purposes of this Section, 5including, without limitation, net revenue from the special 6instant scratch-off game and from gifts, grants, and awards 7from any public or private entity, must be deposited into the 8Fund. Any interest earned on moneys in the Fund must be 9deposited into the Fund. 10    As used in this subsection, "net revenue" means the total 11amount for which tickets have been sold less the sum of the 12amount paid out in the prizes and to retailers, and direct and 13estimated administrative expenses of the Department solely 14related to the scratch-off game under this Section. 15    (c) During the time that tickets are sold for the Illinois 16veterans scratch-off game, the Department shall not 17unreasonably diminish the efforts devoted to marketing any 18other instant scratch-off lottery game.19    (d) The Department may adopt any rules necessary to 20implement and administer the provisions of this Section.21(Source: P.A. 103-381, eff. 7-28-23; 104-234, eff. 8-15-25.)